apertium-panm/apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="ਰਹ__vaux_iv">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋਗੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋਗੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂਗੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂਗੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਣਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਣਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਨੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੂੰ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਿਏ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਏ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਰ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->      

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!।॥]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ਰਹ"><i>ਰਹ</i><par n="ਰਹ__vaux_iv"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
